Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 456.005 is amended to read:
456.005. As used in ORS chapters 456 and 458:
(1) “Culturally responsive organization” means an entity that, as determined by  the
Housing and Community Services Department:
(a) Comprehensively addresses power relationships throughout the organization by
methods that include addressing conflicts and dynamics of inclusion and exclusion;
(b) Has relationships with and is responsive to communities that  the organization serves,
including communities of color;
(c) Hires, promotes, trains and supports staff who are culturally and linguistically diverse
in ways that reflect the communities that  the organization serves, including communities
of color;
(d) Provides culturally responsive service; and
(e) With respect to paragraphs (a) to  (d) of this subsection, has adopted governance
structures, policies and cultural norms to hold its leadership and staff  accountable and to
continue improvements.
(2) “Culturally responsive service” means service that:
(a) Is adapted to maximize the respect of and relevance to the beliefs, practices,  culture
and linguistic needs of the diverse client populations and communities being served, including
clients and communities of color.
(b) Has the capacity to respond to the issues of diverse communities.
(c) Assures competent language access and incorporates diverse cultural  approaches,
strengths, perspectives, experiences, frames  of reference, values, norms and performance
styles of clients and communities to make services and programs more welcoming,  accessi-
ble, appropriate and effective for all eligible and intended recipients.
(3) “Culturally specific organization” means an entity that provides services to a  cultural
community, and may be further defined by rule by the department.
[(1)] (4)  “Federal government” includes the United States of America and any agency  or
instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-B) Page 1
[(2)] (5)  “Housing authority” or “authority”  means any public corporation created under ORS
456.055 to 456.235.
[(3)] (6) “Housing Authorities Law” means ORS 456.055 to 456.235.
SECTION 2.  ORS 456.555 is amended to read:
456.555. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department is established.
(2) The department shall be under the supervision and control of a  director who is responsible
for the performance of the duties  imposed upon the department. The Governor shall appoint the
Director of the Housing and Community Services Department. The director shall  hold office at the
pleasure of the Governor. The person appointed as director  shall be a person who, by training and
experience, is well qualified to perform the duties of the office.
(3) The director shall receive such salary as  may be provided by law, or, if not so provided, as
may be fixed by the Governor. In addition to the salary of  the director, the director shall, subject
to the limitations otherwise provided by  law, be reimbursed for all expenses actually and necessarily
incurred by the director in the performance of official duties.
(4) The  director may establish department divisions including but not limited to divisions for
administration, housing programs and community services programs.
(5) The Oregon Housing Stability Council shall:
(a) With the advice of the director, set policy and approve or disapprove  rules and standards for
housing programs;
(b) Approve or disapprove loans, grants and other funding award proposals under ORS 456.561;
(c) Provide policy direction and  oversight to the department regarding the department’s finan-
cial planning and biennial  budget proposal prior to its submittal to the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services; and
(d) Carry out the provisions of ORS 456.571.
[(6) The Community Action Partnership of Oregon shall advise The Housing and Community  Ser-
vices Department and  the council on community services programs as determined by the director and
as set forth in ORS 458.505. ]
(6) The Housing and Community Services Department  and the council shall consider ad-
vice on housing and community service programs from:
(a) Persons who have experienced housing instability;
(b) Tribes;
(c) The Community Action Partnership of Oregon;
(d) Continuums of care, as defined in 24 C.F.R. part 578;
(e) Local governments;
(f) Nonprofit organizations;
(g) Homeless services providers;
(h) Culturally specific organizations;
(i) Housing providers;
(j) Veterans’ services organizations; and
(k) Other entities identified by the department by rule.
(7) The director shall report regularly to the council to keep the council informed  on progress
made by the department in carrying out the department’s responsibilities for housing programs.
(8) The department shall administer federal programs with advice from the  council.
Federal funds for housing stabilization must, to the extent consistent with  federal law, be
allocated statewide in a manner proportionate to a needs-based and  geographically based
formula.
[(8)] (9)  The department may adopt rules to carry out the  programs that the department is
charged with administering, including, but not limited to, rules regarding:
(a) Administration and enforcement.
(b) Criteria for the granting of benefits.
(c) The establishment of fees and charges.
(d) The identification of housing programs and community services programs.
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-B) Page 2
(e) The distinguishing of housing programs from community services programs.
[(9)] (10)  Subject to the approval of the council,  the department shall establish by rule one or
more threshold property purchase prices above which a housing loan proposed by the  department
requires council review and approval under ORS 456.561. In establishing or  modifying a threshold
property  purchase  price under this subsection, the department shall consider any maximum acqui-
sition cost set  forth in the Internal Revenue Code or federal rules and regulations implementing the
code.
[(10)] (11) Subject to the approval of the council,  the department shall establish by rule one or
more threshold  amounts above which a housing grant or other housing funding award proposal re-
quires council review and approval under ORS 456.561.
SECTION 3.  ORS 458.505 is amended to read:
458.505. (1) The community action agency  network, established initially under the federal Eco-
nomic Opportunity Act of 1964, [ shall be ] is  the  delivery system for federal antipoverty programs in
Oregon,  including :
(a) The Community Services Block Grant[ ,];
(b) Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program[ , State]; and
(c) The United States  Department of Energy Weatherization  Assistance  Program [ and such
others as may become available ].
(2) Funds for  such programs shall be distributed to the community action agencies by the
Housing and  Community Services Department with the advice of the Community Action Partnership
of Oregon.
(3) In areas not served by a community action agency, funds other than federal  community ser-
vices funds may be distributed  to and administered by organizations that are found by the Housing
and Community Services Department to serve the antipoverty purpose of the  community action
agency network.
(4) In addition  to complying with all applicable requirements of federal law, a community action
agency  shall:
(a) Be  an office, division or agency of the designating political subdivision or a not for profit
organization in compliance with ORS chapter 65.
(b) Have a community action board of at least nine but no more than 33 members,  constituted
so that:
(A) One-third of the members of the board are elected  public officials currently serving or their
designees. If the number of elected officials reasonably available and willing to serve is less than
one-third of the membership,  membership of appointed public officials may be counted as meeting the
one-third requirement;
(B) At least one-third of the members are persons chosen through democratic selection proce-
dures adequate to assure that they are representatives of the poor in the area served; and
(C) The  remainder of the members are officials or members of business, industry, labor, religious,
welfare, education or other major groups and interests in the community.
(c) If the agency is a private not for profit organization, be governed by the Community  Action
Board. The board  shall have all duties, responsibilities and powers normally associated with such
boards, including, but not limited to:
(A) Selection, appointment and dismissal of the executive director of the agency;
(B) Approval  of all contracts, grant applications and budgets and operational policies of the
agency;
(C) Evaluation of programs; and
(D) Securing an annual audit of the agency.
(d) If the organization is an office, division or agency of  a political subdivision, be administered
by the board that shall provide for the operation of  the agency and be directly responsible to the
governing board of the political subdivision. The administering board at a minimum, shall:
(A) Review and approve program policy;
(B) Be involved in and consulted on the hiring and firing of the agency director;
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-B) Page 3
(C) Monitor and evaluate program effectiveness;
(D) Ensure the effectiveness of community involvement in the planning process; and
(E) Assume all duties delegated to it by the governing board.
(e) Have a clearly  defined, specified service area. Community action service areas may not
overlap.
(f) Have an accounting system that meets generally  accepted accounting principles and be so
certified by an independent certified accountant.
(g) Provide assurances against the use of government funds for political activity by the  com-
munity action agency.
(h) Provide  assurances that no person shall, on the grounds of race, color, sex, sexual orien-
tation or national origin  be excluded from participation in, be denied the benefits of or be subjected
to discrimination under any program or activity funded in whole or in part with  funds made avail-
able through the community action program.
(i) Provide assurances the community action agency shall  comply with any prohibition against
discrimination on the basis of age under the Age Discrimination Act of 1975  or with respect to an
otherwise qualified individual with disabilities as provided in section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act
of 1973.
(5) For the purposes of this section, the Oregon  Human Development Corporation is eligible to
receive federal community service funds and low-income energy assistance funds.
(6) The Housing and Community Services Department shall:
(a) Administer  federal [ and state] antipoverty programs listed in subsection (1) of this
section.
[(b) Apply for all available  antipoverty  funds  on behalf of eligible entities as defined in this
section.]
[(c)] (b)  In conjunction with the Oregon Housing Stability Council, culturally specific or-
ganizations, the Community Action Partnership of Oregon  and  service providers , develop a
collaborative role in advocating for, and addressing the needs of, all low income Oregonians.
[(d) Biennially produce and make available to the public a status report  on efforts by it and state
agencies to reduce the incidence of poverty in Oregon. This  report shall contain figures regarding the
numbers and types of persons living in poverty in Oregon. The report shall also describe the status  of
efforts by the department and the Department of Human Services to  implement the state policy re-
garding homelessness described in ORS 458.528. ]
[(e)] (c)  On a regular basis provide information to [ the Community Action  Partnership  of
Oregon] service providers on  the activities and expenditures of the Housing and Community Ser-
vices Department.
[(f)] (d) As resources  are available, provide resources for technical assistance, training and
program assistance to Community Action Partnership of Oregon, service providers and  other
eligible entities.
[(g)] (e)  As resources are available, provide resources pursuant to ORS 409.750 for the training
and technical assistance needs of [ the Community Action Partnership of Oregon ] service providers .
[(h)] (f)  [ Conduct a planning process to meet the needs of  low income people in Oregon. That
process shall ] Fully integrate the Oregon  Human Development Corporation into the antipoverty de-
livery system[ . The planning process shall  include development of a plan for ], which must include
a minimum level of services and funding  for low income migrant and seasonal [ farmworkers] agri-
cultural workers from the antipoverty programs administered by the agency.
[(i)] (g)  Limit its administrative budget in an effort to maximize the availability  of antipoverty
federal and state funds for expenditures by local [ eligible entities ] service providers .
SECTION 4.
 ORS 409.750 is amended to read:
409.750. The State of Oregon desires to assist and enable the  poor to achieve maximum feasible
economic self-sufficiency. It shall be a state goal  to eliminate or alleviate the causes and conditions
of poverty in Oregon. The state shall assist service providers, including community-based  or-
ganizations, culturally specific or culturally responsive organizations as defined in  ORS
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-B) Page 4
456.005, nonprofits and community action agencies to stimulate a better  focusing of all available
local, state, federal and private resources upon the goal.
SECTION 5.  ORS 458.650 is amended to read:
458.650. [ (1) The Emergency Housing Account shall be administered by The Housing and Com-
munity Services Department to assist homeless persons and those persons who are  at risk of becoming
homeless. An amount equal to 25 percent of moneys deposited in the  account pursuant to ORS 294.187
is dedicated for expenditure for  assistance to veterans who are homeless or at risk of becoming
homeless. For purposes of this section, “account” means the Emergency Housing Account. ]
[(2) The Oregon Housing Stability Council, with the advice of the Community  Action Partnership
of Oregon, shall develop policy for awarding grants to organizations that shall use the funds: ]
(1) The Housing and Community Services Department  shall administer the Emergency
Housing Account to assist homeless individuals and individuals who  are at risk of becoming
homeless, through means including the emergency housing assistance program and  the state
homeless assistance  program. Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section, the state
homeless assistance program shall serve individuals  experiencing homelessness, especially
unsheltered homelessness, without respect to income.
(2) The Oregon Housing Stability Council shall develop  a policy for the use of program
funds with the advice of:
(a) Persons who have experienced housing instability;
(b) Tribes;
(c) The Community Action Partnership of Oregon;
(d) Continuums of care, as defined in 24 C.F.R. part 578;
(e) Local governments;
(f) Nonprofit organizations;
(g) Homeless services providers;
(h) Culturally specific organizations;
(i) Housing providers;
(j) Veterans’ services organizations; and
(k) Other entities identified by the department by rule.
(3) The policy under subsection (2) of this section  shall direct that program funds shall
be used:
(a) To  provide to low and very low income [ persons] individuals, including but not limited to[ ,
persons] individuals more than 65 years  of age, persons with disabilities, [ farmworkers] agricultural
workers and Native Americans:
(A) Emergency shelters and attendant services;
(B) Transitional housing services  designed to assist [ persons] individuals to make the transition
from homelessness to permanent housing and economic independence;
(C) Supportive housing services to enable [ persons] individuals to continue living in their  own
homes or to provide in-home services for such [ persons] individuals for whom suitable programs do
not exist in their geographic area;
(D) Programs that provide emergency payment of home payments, rents or utilities; or
(E) Some or all of the needs described in subparagraphs (A) to (D) of this paragraph.
(b) To align with federal strategies and resources that are available to prevent  and end
homelessness, including the requirement of providing culturally  responsive services and using
evidence-based and emerging practices effective in ending homelessness, including  practices
unique to rural communities .
[(3)(a)] (4)(a)  The council shall require  as a condition of awarding a grant that the organization
demonstrate to the satisfaction of the council that the organization :
(A) Has the capacity to deliver any service proposed by the organization[ .];
(B) Is a culturally responsive organization or is engaged in a  process to become a cul-
turally responsive organization;
(C) Engages with culturally specific organizations; and
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-B) Page 5
(D) Supports local homelessness system planning efforts.
(b) Any funds granted under this  section shall not be used to replace existing funds. Funds
granted under this section may be used to supplement  existing funds. An organization may use funds
to support existing programs or to establish new programs.
[(c) The council, by policy, shall give preference in granting funds to those organizations that  re-
ceive grants from the Housing Development Grant Program established under ORS 458.625. ]
[(4)] (5)  The department may expend funds  from the account for administration of the account
as provided for in the legislatively approved budget, as that term is defined in ORS 291.002,  for the
department in support of directing a statewide  policy on homelessness that ensures use of
evidence-based and emerging  practices, service equity in funding and local planning
processes.
(6) The department shall utilize outcome-oriented contracting  processes and evidence-
based and emerging practices for account  program funds, including evidence-based and
emerging practices for serving rural communities.
(7) Twenty-five percent of moneys deposited in the  account pursuant to ORS 294.187 are
dedicated to the emergency  housing assistance program for assistance to veterans who are
homeless or at risk of becoming homeless.
SECTION 5a.
Section 5  of this 2021 Act (amending ORS 458.650) is repealed and ORS
458.650, as amended by section 7,  chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2006),
is amended to read:
458.650. [(1) The Emergency Housing Account is administered by  the Housing and Community
Services Department to  assist homeless individuals and those individuals who are at risk of becoming
homeless. An amount equal to 25 percent of moneys deposited in the  account pursuant to ORS 294.187
is dedicated for expenditure for  assistance to veterans who are homeless or at risk of becoming
homeless. For purposes of this section, “account” means the Emergency Housing Account. ]
[(2) The Oregon Housing Stability Council, with the advice of the Community  Action Partnership
of Oregon, shall develop policy for awarding grants to organizations that shall use the funds: ]
(1) The Housing and Community Services Department  shall administer the Emergency
Housing Account to assist homeless individuals and individuals who  are at risk of becoming
homeless, through means including the emergency housing assistance program and  the state
homeless assistance  program. Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section, the state
homeless assistance program shall serve individuals  experiencing homelessness, especially
unsheltered homelessness, without respect to income.
(2) The Oregon Housing Stability Council shall develop  a policy for the use of program
funds with the advice of:
(a) Persons who have experienced housing instability;
(b) Tribes;
(c) The Community Action Partnership of Oregon;
(d) Continuums of care, as defined in 24 C.F.R. part 578;
(e) Local governments;
(f) Nonprofit organizations;
(g) Homeless services providers;
(h) Culturally specific organizations;
(i) Housing providers;
(j) Veterans’ services organizations; and
(k) Other entities identified by the department by rule.
(3) The policy under subsection (2) of this section  shall direct that program funds shall
be used:
(a) To provide to low and very low income individuals, including but not limited  to[ ,] individuals
more than 65  years of age, persons with disabilities, [ farmworkers] agricultural workers and Native
Americans:
(A) Emergency shelters and attendant services;
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-B) Page 6
(B) Transitional housing services designed to assist individuals to make the  transition from
homelessness to permanent housing and economic independence;
(C) Supportive  housing services to enable individuals to continue living in their own homes or
to provide in-home services for such individuals for whom suitable programs do not exist in  their
geographic area;
(D) Programs that provide emergency payment of home payments, rents or utilities; or
(E) Some or all of the needs described in subparagraphs (A) to (D) of this paragraph.
(b) To align  with federal strategies and resources that are available to prevent and end
homelessness, including the requirement of providing culturally  responsive services and using
evidence-based and emerging practices effective in ending homelessness, including practices
unique to rural communities .
[(3)(a)] (4)(a)  The council shall require  as a condition of awarding a grant that the organization
demonstrate to the satisfaction of the council that the organization :
(A) Has the capacity to deliver any service proposed by the organization[ .];
(B) Is a culturally responsive organization  or is engaged in a process to become a cul-
turally responsive organization;
(C) Engages with culturally specific organizations; and
(D) Supports local homelessness system planning efforts.
(b) Any funds granted under this section may not be used to replace existing funds. Funds
granted under this section may be used to supplement  existing funds. An organization may use funds
to support existing programs or to establish new programs.
[(c) The  council, by policy, shall give preference in granting funds to those organizations that re-
ceive grants from the Housing Development Grant Program established under ORS 458.625. ]
[(4)] (5) The department may expend funds from the account for:
(a) The administration of the account as provided for in the  legislatively approved budget, as
that term is defined in ORS 291.002, for the department  in support of directing a statewide policy
on homelessness that ensures use of evidence-based and  emerging practices, service equity
in funding and local planning processes .
(b) The development of technical assistance and training resources  for organizations developing
and operating emergency shelters as defined in section 2 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 18,  Oregon
Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2006),  and  transitional housing accommodations as described in
ORS 446.265.
(6) The department shall utilize outcome-oriented contracting  processes and evidence-
based and emerging practices for account  program funds, including evidence-based and
emerging practices for serving rural communities.
(7) Twenty-five percent of moneys deposited in the  account pursuant to ORS 294.187 are
dedicated to the emergency  housing assistance program for assistance to veterans who are
homeless or at risk of becoming homeless.
SECTION 5b.
 Section 11, chapter  18, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2006), is amended
to read:
Sec. 11. Notwithstanding ORS 458.650 [ (2) and ] (3)  and (4) , the Housing and Community Ser-
vices Department may  expend funds from the Emergency Housing Account to award grants and
provide technical assistance under section 9 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 2006).
SECTION 5c.  Section 12, chapter 18,  Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2006), is amended
to read:
Sec. 12. (1) Sections 9[ , 10 and 11 of this 2021 Act ] and 10, chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 2006),  are repealed on January 2, 2024.
(2) Section 11, chapter 18, Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2006), as amended  by
section 5b of this 2021 Act, is repealed on January 2, 2024.
SECTION 6.  ORS 456.561 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-B) Page 7
456.561. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department may effect loans, grants and other
funding awards to accomplish department housing programs, subject  to any requirement under this
section for review and approval by the  Oregon Housing Stability Council of proposals for loans,
grants or other funding awards.
(2) The department shall submit a loan, grant or other funding award proposal arising  under
ORS 456.515 to 456.725 programs to the council for review if the proposal is for:
(a) A housing loan on property that has a purchase  price in excess of an applicable threshold
property purchase price established by rule under ORS 456.555 [ (9)] (10); or
(b) A housing grant or other housing funding award in excess of an applicable  threshold amount
established by rule under ORS 456.555 [ (10)] (11).
(3) The council shall review each loan, grant or other funding award proposal submitted  by the
department under this section and approve or disapprove the loan, grant or other  funding award
proposal.
(4) Council review of loan, grant or other funding award  proposals under this section shall be
held at a public hearing of the council. The  council meeting notice required by ORS 192.640 shall
include notice of the loan, grant or other funding award proposal review, the names  of the appli-
cants and the subject  of the loan, grant or funding award proposal. The council shall provide notice
of a loan, grant or other funding award proposal review to the loan, grant  or other funding award
applicant not less than five days before the review hearing.
SECTION 7. (1) The Task Force on Homelessness and Racial Disparities is established.
(2) The task force consists of 19 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two members from among  members of the
Senate;
(b) The Speaker of the House of  Representatives shall appoint two members from among
members of the House of Representatives;
(c) The Governor shall appoint one member from the Racial Justice Council;
(d) The Director of the  Housing and Community Services Department shall appoint two
members to represent the Housing and Community Services Department or  Oregon Housing
Stability Council; and
(e) The President of the Senate and the Speaker  of the House of Representatives shall
jointly appoint 12 members that represent organizations with diverse perspectives and expe-
riences, including organizations that focus on street  outreach and unsheltered homelessness,
shelter, rapid rehousing, homelessness prevention or  domestic and sexual violence, organ-
izations that address the needs  of various people experiencing housing instability, including
youth, children and families, adults  or seniors, and organizations representing different
communities and geographies across Oregon as follows:
(A) Two members from local governments or  representing the interests of local govern-
ments;
(B) Two members from community action agencies;
(C) Two members from culturally specific organizations as defined in ORS 456.005;
(D) Two members from homeless service providers in urban areas;
(E) Two members from homeless service providers in rural areas; and
(F) Two members who have experienced housing instability.
(3) The task force shall:
(a) Identify  and investigate methods by which the state may decrease rates of racial
disparity among people experiencing homelessness and receiving services.
(b) Identify and investigate  potential changes in this state’s funding structure to address
racial disparities among people experiencing homelessness and housing insecurity,  including
consideration of how housing transition of services delivery could be implemented  to avoid
service disruptions among people experiencing homelessness or housing insecurity.
(c) Consider existing methods and recommend additional methods by which the  Housing
and Community Services Department and Oregon  Housing Stability Council may receive ad-
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-B) Page 8
vice and information  about needed services for individuals experiencing homelessness and
housing insecurity.
(d) Identify and investigate methods by which the Housing  and Community Services De-
partment and Oregon Housing Stability Council may modify contracting process and eligibil-
ity for providers of services for individuals  experiencing homelessness and housing
insecurity.
(e) Recommend solutions regarding the funding of  services for individuals experiencing
homelessness or housing insecurity, including legislation or  rulemaking and modifications to:
(A) The delivery and eligibility requirements for federal and state funds;
(B) The receipt and  distribution of information about homelessness and homelessness
services by the state; and
(C) Methods for addressing racial disparities.
(4) The task force may consult experts,  form subcommittees or advisory committees,
conduct field investigations, hearings and other meetings, receive testimony in any form or
format, request or require production of  documents and other evidence and otherwise take
any lawful action to carry out the purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) A majority of the members of the  task force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(6) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the  members
of the task force.
(7) The task force shall elect one or more task force members to serve as a  chairperson
or cochairs.
(8) If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(9) The task force shall meet in a regular location  no less than monthly until January
31, 2022, and at other times and places specified by the call of the chairperson or cochairs
or by a majority of the members of the task force.
(10) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(11) The Housing and Community Services Department shall provide staff support to  the
task force and shall provide a third-party facilitator to assist  the chairperson or cochairs
with the facilitation of meetings and the operations of  the task force. Notwithstanding ORS
279A.025, ORS chapter 279B does not apply  to the department’s procurement of a facilitator
under this section.
(12) A member of the  task force is not entitled to compensation, but in the discretion
of the department  may be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel and other expenses
incurred by the member in the performance of the member’s duties or provided a stipend.
(13) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in  the performance of the task force’s duties and, to the extent permitted by
laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information  and advice the members of the task
force consider necessary to perform their duties.
(14) No later  than January 15, 2022, the task force shall provide a report to an appropri-
ate committee of the Legislative Assembly  in the manner provided in ORS 192.245 on the
findings and recommendations made under subsection (3) of this section. A  copy of the re-
port shall be delivered to the Oregon Housing Stability Council.
SECTION 8.
Section 7 of this 2021 Act is repealed on July 1, 2022.
SECTION 9. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-B) Page 9
Passed by House June 15, 2021
Repassed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2100 (HB 2100-B) Page 10